Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.255

Incorporation by reference.

A will may incorporate by reference any writing in existence when the will is executed if the will itself manifests the testator's intent to incorporate the writing and describes the writing sufficiently to permit its identification. In the case of any inconsistency between the writing and the will, the will controls.

[ 1985 c 23 s 3. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 6.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Purpose—Application—Severability—1985 c 23: See notes following RCW 11.12.250.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.